North Carolina, session 2025, HB423.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 2J. Single-Use Foodware and Condiments.
"§ 130A-309.235. Definitions.
Unless a different meaning is required by context, the following definitions apply throughout
this Part:
(1) Food establishment. – An establishment that prepares and serves food or drink
as regulated pursuant to Part 6 of Article 8 of this Chapter.
(2) Prepared food. – Food or beverages that are serviced, packaged, cooked,
chopped, sliced, mixed, brewed, frozen, squeezed, poured, or otherwise
prepared by a food establishment in a form that is edible without additional
preparation. Prepared food does not include raw eggs or raw, butchered meats,
fish, or poultry sold from a butcher case, refrigerator case, or similar retail
appliance.
(3) Single item dispenser. – A device that stores bulk amounts of single-use
foodware or standard condiments and dispenses one item at a time.
(4) Single-use. – Designed to be used once and then disposed, and not designed
for repeated use and sanitizing.
(5) Single-use foodware. – A single-use accessory provided alongside prepared
food, including utensils, tongs, chopsticks, napkins, standard condiments,
straws, stirrers, splash sticks, cocktail sticks, toothpicks, cup lids, cup sleeves,
cup trays, and food trays.
(6) Standard condiment or condiment. – A single-use packet containing relishes,
spices, sauces, confections, or seasonings; that requires no additional
preparation; and that is used on food or beverages, including ketchup,
mustard, mayonnaise, soy sauce, sauerkraut, salsa, syrup, jam, jelly, salad
dressing, salt, sugar, sugar substitutes, pepper, and chili pepper.
(7) Third-party food delivery platform. – A person that operates a website or
mobile application through which a consumer can order prepared food from a
food establishment for pickup or delivery.
(8) Utensil. – An instrument used to serve or eat food, including forks, spoons,
knives, sporks, and chopsticks.
"§ 130A-309.236. Consumer opt-in for single-use foodware.
(a) Except as provided in G.S. 130A-309.237, a food establishment shall not provide any
single-use foodware or standard condiments to consumers for on-premises dining, take-out, and
delivery orders, or when using a third-party food delivery platform, unless the consumer requests
the single-use foodware or condiment.
(b) A food establishment shall not bundle or package single-use foodware or standard
condiments in a manner that prevents consumers from taking only the type of single-use
foodware or condiment desired without having to take a different type of single-use foodware or
condiment.
(c) A third-party food delivery platform shall not allow consumers to use the platform to
place orders from a food establishment without providing an option on the platform for
consumers to request single-use foodware or standard condiments from the food establishment.
"§ 130A-309.237. Exceptions.
Page 2 House Bill 423-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) For delivery orders, food establishments may include specific accessories such as cup
lids, spill plugs, and trays in order to prevent spills or otherwise deliver food and beverages
safely.
(b) This Part shall not be construed to prohibit a food establishment from making standard
condiments available to consumers using refillable single item dispensers.
"§ 130A-309.238. Liability; enforcement.
(a) If the Department finds that a food establishment has failed to comply with the
requirements of this Part, the Department may issue a written notice to the food establishment of
its findings and direct the food establishment to take remedial action to comply with the
requirements of this Part. The Department shall allow the noncompliant food establishment 60
calendar days from the receipt of the notice of noncompliance to demonstrate compliance to the
satisfaction of the Department. If after 60 calendar days following receipt of the notice of
noncompliance the food establishment fails to demonstrate compliance with the requirements of
this Part, the Department may impose administrative penalties against the food establishment
pursuant to G.S. 130A-22(a). Third-party food delivery platforms are not liable for the failure of
a food establishment to comply with this Part.
(b) If the Department finds that a third-party food delivery platform has failed to comply
with the requirements of this Part, the Department may issue a written notice to the third-party
food delivery platform of its findings and direct the third-party food delivery platform to take
remedial action to comply with the requirements of this Part. The Department shall allow the
noncompliant third-party food delivery platform 60 calendar days from the receipt of the notice
of noncompliance to demonstrate compliance to the satisfaction of the Department. If after 60
calendar days following receipt of the notice of noncompliance the third-party food delivery
platform fails to demonstrate compliance with the requirements of this Part, the Department may
impose administrative penalties against the third-party food delivery platform pursuant to
G.S. 130A-22(a). Food establishments are not liable for the failure of a third-party food delivery
platform to comply with this Part.
(c) The Department shall establish and maintain an online portal by which individuals
can report violations of this Part to the Department.
"§ 130A-309.239. Local government authority not preempted.
Nothing in this Part shall be construed as limiting the authority of any local government to
adopt ordinances that restrict the provision of single-use foodware by food establishments or
third-party food delivery platforms."
SECTION 2. G.S. 130A-22 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-22. Administrative penalties.
(a) The Secretary of Environmental Quality may impose an administrative penalty on a
person who violates Article 9 of this Chapter, rules adopted by the Environmental Management
Commission pursuant to Article 9, or any term or condition of a permit or order issued under
Article 9. Each day of a continuing violation shall constitute a separate violation. The penalty
shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per day in the case of a violation involving
nonhazardous waste. The penalty shall not exceed thirty-two thousand five hundred dollars
($32,500) per day in the case of a first violation involving hazardous waste as defined in
G.S. 130A-290 or involving the disposal of medical waste as defined in G.S. 130A-290 in or
upon water in a manner that results in medical waste entering waters or lands of the State; and
shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per day for a second or further violation
involving the disposal of medical waste as defined in G.S. 130A-290 in or upon water in a manner
that results in medical waste entering waters or lands of the State. The penalty shall not exceed
thirty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($32,500) per day for a violation involving a voluntary
remedial action implemented pursuant to G.S. 130A-310.9(c) or a violation of the rules adopted
pursuant to G.S. 130A-310.12(b). For violations of Part 2J of Article 9 of this Chapter, the
penalty shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) per day. For violations of Part 7 of Article
House Bill 423-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
9 of this Chapter and G.S. 130A-309.10(m): (i) a warning shall be issued for a first violation; (ii)
the penalty shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) for a second violation; and (iii) the
penalty shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) for subsequent violations. If a person
fails to pay a civil penalty within 60 days after the final agency decision or court order has been
served on the violator, the Secretary of Environmental Quality shall request the Attorney General
to institute a civil action in the superior court of any county in which the violator resides or has
his or its principal place of business to recover the amount of the assessment. Such civil actions
must be filed within three years of the date the final agency decision or court order was served
on the violator.
…."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to violations
committed on or after that date.
Page 4 House Bill 423-First Edition